Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 10 Mergers and Consolidations Involving
Electric Membership Corporations
and Foreign Electric
Cooperatives

46-3-380.
Procedure for merger generally.

Any two or more electric membership corporations may merge into one of such electric membership corporations pursuant to a plan of merger approved in the manner provided in this part.

The board of directors of each electric membership corporation participating in the merger shall, by resolution adopted by each such board, approve a plan of merger setting forth:

The names of the electric membership corporations proposing to merge, and the name of the electric membership corporation into which they propose to merge, which shall be referred to in this part as the surviving electric membership corporation;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger;

The manner and basis of converting the membership interests into membership interests, rights, obligations, or securities of the surviving electric membership corporation or of any other corporation or, in whole or in part, into cash or other property;

A statement of any changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving electric membership corporation to be effected by such merger; and

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed merger as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1001, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-381.
Procedure for consolidation generally.

Any two or more electric membership corporations may consolidate into a new electric membership corporation pursuant to a plan of consolidation approved in the manner provided in this part.

The board of directors of each electric membership corporation participating in the consolidation shall, by a resolution adopted by each such board, approve a plan of consolidation setting forth:

The names of the electric membership corporations proposing to consolidate and the name of the new electric membership corporation into which they propose to consolidate, which shall be referred to in this article as the new electric membership corporation;

The terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation;

The manner and basis of converting the membership interests into membership interests, rights, obligations, or securities of the new electric membership corporation or any other corporation or, in whole or in part, into cash or other property;

With respect to the new electric membership corporation, all of the statements required to be set forth in articles of incorporation for electric membership corporations organized under this article; and

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed consolidation as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 15; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 6; Code 1933, § 34C-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-382.
Approval of merger or consolidation plan by members.

The board of directors of each electric membership corporation, upon approving such plan of merger or plan of consolidation, shall by resolution direct that the plan be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members, which may be either an annual or special meeting.

Written notice shall be given to each member not less than 30 days before such meeting, in the manner provided in Code Section 46-3-263 for the giving of notice of meetings of members, and, regardless of whether the meeting is an annual or a special meeting, shall state that the purpose or one of the purposes is to consider the proposed plan of merger or consolidation. Such notice shall include:

A copy of the plan of merger or consolidation or an outline of the material features of the plan; and

A copy of the most recent annual balance sheet and annual profit and loss statement, or comparable financial statements, of each of the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations.

If an electric membership corporation which is a party to any such plan provides retail service, notice that the merger is proposed and of the times and places of the proposed meetings of members for the purpose of voting on the merger shall be delivered not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days before such meeting to the publisher of each newspaper which is the official organ of each county in which each electric membership corporation provides service or to the publisher of one or more newspapers of general circulation published within each such county whose most recently published annual statement of ownership and circulation reflects a minimum of 60 percent paid circulation, together with a check, draft, or money order in the amount of $15.00 in payment of the cost of publishing such notice and a request that such notice be published one time as soon as practicable, but in any event within ten days after receipt of the notice by the newspaper.

At each such meeting, a vote of the members shall be taken on the proposed plan of merger or consolidation. The proposed plan shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes of the members present and voting, at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

After the plan of merger or consolidation has been approved and at any time prior to the issuance of the certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation by the Secretary of State as provided in subsection (f) of Code Section 46-3-383, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 15; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 6; Code 1933, § 34C-1003, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46.

46-3-383.
Contents of articles of merger or articles of consolidation; obtaining of certificate from Secretary of State upon use of new name; procedures involving filing, issuance, rejection, and publication of articles of merger or articles of consolidation.

Articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be executed by each electric membership corporation, as provided in Code Section 46-3-173, and shall set forth:

The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation, including the proposed name of the surviving or new electric membership corporation, which name may be that of any of the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations or any other available name permitted under this article;

As to each consolidating electric membership corporation and as to each merging electric membership corporation the members of which voted on such plan, a statement of the member vote required to adopt the plan of merger or consolidation, the number of members entitled to vote, and the vote for the plan; and

The effective time and date of the merger or consolidation if the effective time and date of the merger or consolidation is to be after the delivery of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation to the Secretary of State, as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-384.

If the proposed name of the surviving or new electric membership corporation is not that of any of the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations, any one of those electric membership corporations shall obtain from the Secretary of State a certificate which states that such name is available in accordance with Code Section 46-3-220. Such certificate shall be issued upon application to reserve the use of the proposed corporate name as provided in Code Section 46-3-221 and shall be valid for the period provided in Code Section 46-3-221, including any extension of such period granted by the Secretary of State. Upon the expiration of such period or any extension thereof, the certificate shall become void unless a certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation shall have been issued by the Secretary of State within such time.

The merging or consolidating electric membership corporations shall cause the original articles of merger or the original articles of consolidation and two conformed copies of the articles of merger or the articles of consolidation to be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174.

Together with the articles of merger or articles of consolidation, the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations shall cause to be delivered to the Secretary of State:

If subsection (b) of this Code section is applicable, the certificate issued by the Secretary of State reserving the proposed name for the surviving or new electric membership corporation;

Payment to the Secretary of State of the fee provided for in Code Section 46-3-501;

A check, draft, or money order in the amount of $16.00, payable to the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the surviving or new electric membership corporation is to be located, in payment of the cost of filing the articles of merger or articles of consolidation in that county;

A letter addressed to the publisher of a newspaper which is the official organ of the county where the registered office of the surviving or new electric membership corporation is to be located or which is a newspaper of general circulation published within that county whose most recently published annual statement of ownership and circulation reflects a minimum of 60 percent paid circulation. This letter shall contain a notice to be published four times in the newspaper and shall be in substantially the following form:

Click to view

A check, draft, or money order in the amount of $60.00 payable to the designated newspaper.

Upon delivery of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall affix thereon the hour, day, month, and year of delivery. Not later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery, the Secretary of State shall either issue a certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation in the manner provided in this Code section or reject the articles in the manner provided in this Code section.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles of merger or articles of consolidation appear to be in proper form for filing and are accompanied by the other items required by subsection (d) of this Code section, he shall, in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174:

Issue a certificate of merger or a certificate of consolidation which shall state that the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations have been or will be duly merged or consolidated, as the case may be, and the effective date thereof, by the filing of articles of merger or articles of consolidation in the office of the Secretary of State and the fees paid therefor, as provided by law, and attach the certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation to one conformed copy of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation;

Return the certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation, with the conformed copy of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation attached thereto, to the surviving or new electric membership corporation, as the case may be, or its representative. A copy of the certificate shall be attached to the original articles of merger or articles of consolidation;

Forward a conformed copy of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation, with a copy of the certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation, as the case may be, attached thereto, along with the check, draft, or money order provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (d) of this Code section, to the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the surviving or new electric membership corporation is to be located, within four business days after the articles of merger or articles of consolidation have been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing; and

Mail the letter and the check, draft, or money order provided for in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subsection (d) of this Code section to the designated newspaper within four business days after the articles of merger or articles of consolidation have been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles of merger or articles of consolidation do not appear to be in proper form for filing or are not accompanied by the other items required by subsection (d) of this Code section, he shall reject the articles for filing and shall immediately notify the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations or their representative of such rejection by mailing a notice no later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation for filing. This notice shall specify the reason or reasons for rejection of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation; and the articles and all accompanying materials shall be returned therewith.

The conformed copy of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation, with a copy of the certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation attached thereto, provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (f) of this Code section shall be filed upon receipt by the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the surviving or new electric membership corporation is to be located. Failure on the part of the Secretary of State to mail the conformed copy of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation or failure on the part of the clerk of the superior court to comply with this subsection shall not invalidate the issuance of the certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation by the Secretary of State.

The notice provided for in paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of this Code section and in subsection (b) of Code Section 46-3-382 shall be published within ten days after receipt of the notice by the newspaper. Failure on the part of the Secretary of State to mail the notice provided for in paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of this Code section or failure on the part of the newspaper to comply with this subsection shall not affect the validity of the meeting of members at which the merger or consolidation is approved or the validity of the certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation issued by the Secretary of State.

(name and address of the newspaper designated by the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations) Dear Sirs: You are requested to publish, four times, a notice in the following form: “A (merger) (consolidation) (has been) (will be) effected by and between (name and state of incorporation of each of the constituent electric membership corporations) on (month, day, and year to be inserted by the Secretary of State) by the issuance of a certificate of (merger) (consolidation) by the Secretary of State, in accordance with the applicable provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, the ‘Georgia Electric Membership Corporation Act.’ The name of the (surviving electric membership corporation in the merger) (new electric membership corporation resulting from the consolidation) (is) (will be) (set forth the name and state of incorporation of the surviving electric membership corporation or new electric membership corporation, as the case may be), the registered office of which (is) (will be) located at (address of registered office).” Enclosed is a (check, draft, or money order) in the amount of $60.00 in payment of the cost of publishing this notice. Very truly yours, (Name and address of merging or consolidating electric membership corporations or their representative)

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 15; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 6; Code 1933, § 34C-1004, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-384.
Effect of merger or consolidation.

If the Secretary of State issues a certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation, the merger or consolidation shall become effective as of the time of delivery to the Secretary of State of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation so certified, as provided in Code Section 46-3-383, or at such later time and date as the articles shall specify, not to exceed 60 days from the date of delivery of the articles to the Secretary of State.

When such merger or consolidation has become effective:

The several electric membership corporations which are parties to the plan of merger or consolidation shall be a single electric membership corporation, which, in the case of a merger, shall be that electric membership corporation designated in the plan of merger as the surviving electric membership corporation and, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new electric membership corporation provided for in the plan of consolidation;

The separate existence of all electric membership corporations which are parties to the plan of merger or consolidation, except the surviving or new electric membership corporation, shall cease;

Such surviving or new electric membership corporation shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of an electric membership corporation organized under this article;

Such surviving or new electric membership corporation shall thereupon and thereafter possess all the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, of a public as well as of a private nature, of each of the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations; and all property, whether real, personal, or mixed, and all debts due on whatever account, and all other choses in action, and all and every other interest of or belonging to or due to each of the electric membership corporations so merged or consolidated shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in such a single electric membership corporation without further act or deed; and the title to any real estate, or any interest therein, vested in any of such electric membership corporations shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of such merger or consolidation;

Such surviving or new electric membership corporation shall thenceforth be responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the electric membership corporations so merged or consolidated; and any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against any of such electric membership corporations may be prosecuted as if such merger or consolidation had not taken place; or such surviving or new electric membership corporation may be substituted in its place. Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any such electric membership corporation shall be impaired by such merger or consolidation;

In the case of a merger, the articles of incorporation of the surviving electric membership corporation shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in its articles of incorporation are stated in the plan of merger; and, in the case of a consolidation, the statements set forth in the articles of consolidation and which are required or permitted to be set forth in the articles of incorporation of electric membership corporations organized under this article shall be deemed to be the original articles of incorporation of the new electric membership corporation.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1005, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-385.
Merger or consolidation of electric membership corporations and foreign electric cooperatives.

One or more foreign electric cooperatives and one or more electric membership corporations may be merged or consolidated into an electric membership corporation or a foreign electric cooperative, if such merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws of the jurisdiction under which each such foreign electric cooperative is organized.

With respect to procedure, including all filing and advertising requirements:

Each such foreign electric cooperative shall comply with the applicable provisions of the laws of the jurisdiction under which it is organized;

Each electric membership corporation shall comply with the provisions of this article relating to the merger or consolidation, as the case may be, of electric membership corporations. If the surviving or new corporation is to be a foreign electric cooperative without a registered office in this state, the notice provided for in paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of Code Section 46-3-383 shall be published, and the conformed copy of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (f) of Code Section 46-3-383 shall be filed in the county where the registered office of any of the electric membership corporations is located.

If the surviving or new corporation, as the case may be, is to be governed by the laws of any jurisdiction other than this state, it shall comply with the provisions of this article with respect to foreign electric cooperatives if it is to transact business in this state, and in every case it shall be deemed to have filed with the Secretary of State of this state:

An agreement that it may be served with process in this state in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any electric membership corporation which is a party to such merger or consolidation; and

An irrevocable appointment of the Secretary of State of this state as its agent to accept service of process in any such proceeding.

If the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the laws of this state, the effect of such merger or consolidation shall be the same as in the case of the merger or consolidation of electric membership corporations. If the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the laws of any jurisdiction other than this state, the effect of such merger or consolidation shall be the same as in the case of the merger or consolidation of electric membership corporations except insofar as the laws of such other jurisdiction provide otherwise.

At any time prior to the issuance of the certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation by the Secretary of State, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1006, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.